Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 5. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF HORTICULTURAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE B. HORTICULTURAL DISEASES AND PESTS

CHAPTER 77. FIRE ANT CONTROL

Sec. 77.001. COMMISSIONERS COURT MAY ESTABLISH PROGRAM. The commissioners court of any county may establish, implement, and conduct a program for the eradication or control of the imported fire ant.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1207, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 628, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 2.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 77.002. COORDINATION WITH OTHER PROGRAMS. The program established under this chapter may be conducted independently of or in conjunction with any related program conducted and financed by private or other public entities.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1207, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 628, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 2.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 77.003. COST OF PROGRAM. The commissioners court may expend any available county funds to pay for all or its share of the cost of a program established under this chapter, including funds derived from taxation under the 80-cent limitation of Article VIII, Section 9, of the Texas Constitution.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1207, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 628, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 2.001, eff. September 1, 2019.